Hawaii, session 2025, HB1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 356D-64, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Upon eviction, the household goods and personal effects of the tenant against whom the order is entered, and those of any persons using the premises incident to the tenantꞌs holding, may be removed from the premises and stored by the authority.  If the action is taken, the authority shall have a lien on the property taken for the expenses incurred by the authority in moving and storing the property, and the authority is authorized to sell or otherwise dispose of the property if unclaimed after [thirty] fourteen days." SECTION 2. Section 356D-94, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Upon eviction, the household goods and personal effects of the person against whom the order is entered, and those of any persons using the premises incident to the personꞌs holding, may be removed from the premises and stored by the authority.  If the action is taken, the authority shall have a lien on the property so taken for the expenses incurred by it in moving and storing the same, and the authority is authorized to sell or otherwise dispose of the property if unclaimed after [thirty] fourteen days." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST